District of Columbia statutes.
5-115.01

Limitation on period of questioning; advisement of rights; release uncharged; admissibility of confessions.

(a)

Any person arrested in the District of Columbia may be questioned with respect to any matter for a period not to exceed 3 hours immediately following his arrest. Such person shall be advised of and accorded his rights under applicable law respecting any such interrogation. In the case of any such arrested person who is released without being charged with a crime, his detention shall not be recorded as an arrest in any official record.

(b)

Any statement, admission, or confession made by an arrested person within 3 hours immediately following his arrest shall not be excluded from evidence in the courts of the District of Columbia solely because of delay in presentment.

History

Dec. 27, 1967, 81 Stat. 735, Pub. L. 90-226, title III, § 301

Section References

This section is referenced in § 5-302.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 4-140.
1973 Ed., § 4-140a.